apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="mu/ka__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ka</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>k</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>kã</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gsi</l>      <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gs</l>      <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gsã</l>    <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gsã</l>    <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="muitin/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>         <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="munaafɩ/ka__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ka</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>k</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>kã</l>        <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gsi</l>      <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gs</l>      <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ksi</l>      <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ks</l>      <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ksã</l>    <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>gsã</l>    <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="na/aaba__n">
		<e>       <p><l>aaba</l>      <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aab</l>      <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>aabã</l>      <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>nams</l>     <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>namse</l>     <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>namse</l>     <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>namsã</l>     <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>namsã</l>     <r>aaba<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="na/ongo__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ongo</l>      <r>ongo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ong</l>      <r>ongo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ongã</l>      <r>ongo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>nda</l>       <r>ongo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>nda</l>       <r>ongo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ndã</l>       <r>ongo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="nasaaren/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="na-tagd/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>s</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="na-tẽ/nga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ng</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>nga</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ngã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>emse</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ens</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ense</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>emsã</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ensã</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="natẽ/nga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>ng</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>nga</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ngã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>emse</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ens</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ense</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>emsã</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ensã</l>      <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="na-wʋʋ/do__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>do</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>s</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>do<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="nayũ/uri__n">
		<e>       <p><l>uri</l>       <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ur</l>       <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>urã</l>       <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ya</l>        <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>y</l>        <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>yã</l>        <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>yã</l>        <r>uri<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="ne/da__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ba</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>bã</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>bã</l>        <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="nin-buii/du__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>du<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>du</l>        <r>du<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>du<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="ne/ere__n">
		<e>       <p><l>er</l>       <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>erã</l>       <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ya</l>        <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ya</l>        <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>yã</l>        <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>yã</l>        <r>ere<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="muka">            <i>mu</i><par n="mu/ka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="muitinga">        <i>muitin</i><par n="muitin/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="munaafɩka">       <i>munaafɩ</i><par n="munaafɩ/ka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="naaaba">          <i>na</i><par n="na/aaba__n"/></e>
	<e lm="naongo">          <i>na</i><par n="na/ongo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="nasaarende">      <i>nasaaren</i><par n="nasaaren/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="na-tagda">        <i>na-tagd</i><par n="na-tagd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="na-tẽnga">        <i>na-tẽ</i><par n="na-tẽ/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="natẽnga">        <i>natẽ</i><par n="natẽ/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="na-wʋʋdo">        <i>na-wʋʋ</i><par n="na-wʋʋ/do__n"/></e>
	<e lm="nayũuri">         <i>nayũ</i><par n="nayũ/uri__n"/></e>
	<e lm="neda">            <i>ne</i><par n="ne/da__n"/></e>
	<e lm="neere">           <i>ne</i><par n="ne/ere__n"/></e>
	<e lm="nin-buii/du">        <i>nin-buii</i><par n="nin-buii/du__n"/></e>
	<e lm="muka">            <i>mu</i><par n="mu/ka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="muitinga">        <i>muitin</i><par n="muitin/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="munaafɩka">       <i>munaafɩ</i><par n="munaafɩ/ka__n"/></e>
	<e lm="naaaba">          <i>na</i><par n="na/aaba__n"/></e>
	<e lm="naongo">          <i>na</i><par n="na/ongo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="nasaarende">      <i>nasaaren</i><par n="nasaaren/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="na-tagda">        <i>na-tagd</i><par n="na-tagd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="na-tẽnga">        <i>na-tẽ</i><par n="na-tẽ/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="natẽnga">        <i>natẽ</i><par n="natẽ/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="na-wʋʋdo">        <i>na-wʋʋ</i><par n="na-wʋʋ/do__n"/></e>
	<e lm="nayũuri">         <i>nayũ</i><par n="nayũ/uri__n"/></e>
	<e lm="neda">            <i>ne</i><par n="ne/da__n"/></e>
	<e lm="neere">           <i>ne</i><par n="ne/ere__n"/></e>
	<e lm="nin-buii/du">        <i>nin-buii</i><par n="nin-buii/du__n"/></e>
